Florida, session 2026, HB221.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. This act may be cited as the "On-the-Job
Workforce Training Act."
Section 2. Subsection (3) of section 448.110, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb221-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 221 2026
448.110 State minimum wage; annual wage adjustment;
enforcement.—
(3)(a) Employers shall pay employees a minimum wage at an
hourly rate of $6.15 for all hours worked in Florida. Only those
individuals entitled to receive the federal minimum wage under
the federal Fair Labor Standards Act, as amended, and its
implementing regulations shall be eligible to receive the state
minimum wage pursuant to s. 24, Art. X of the State Constitution
and this section. The provisions of ss. 213 and 214 of the
federal Fair Labor Standards Act, as interpreted by applicable
federal regulations and implemented by the Secretary of Labor,
are incorporated herein.
(b)1. An employer is not subject to the state minimum wage
requirements of this section for an employee who is in a
structured work-study, internship, or preapprenticeship program,
or other similar work-based learning opportunity, and such
employee opts out of receiving the minimum wage.
a. Such work-based learning opportunity may not last
longer than 252 days or, if the employee is earning credit at a
school, Florida College System institution, or state university,
two semesters, whichever is longer.
b. If the employee is under 18 years of age, such work-
based learning opportunity may not last longer than 126 days or,
if the employee is earning credit at a school, Florida College
System institution, or state university, one semester, whichever
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb221-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 221 2026
is longer.
2. For purposes of this paragraph, the term "work-based
learning opportunity" means any interaction with industry or
community professionals which occurs in a workplace setting with
the sole purpose of providing the employee with an authentic
structured learning experience and on-the-job training that
fosters in-depth, firsthand engagement with the tasks required
in a given career field in order to become qualified and
proficient in such career field. A work-based learning
opportunity must meet all of the following criteria:
a. Be developmentally appropriate.
b. Identify learning objectives for the term of the
experience.
c. Explore multiple aspects of an industry.
d. Develop workplace skills and competencies.
e. Assess employee performance.
f. Be documented and reported in compliance with state and
federal labor laws.
(c) An employee may opt out of receiving the state minimum
wage by voluntarily signing a waiver of his or her right to the
state minimum wage established under this subsection. The waiver
must state that the employee acknowledges his or her right to
the state minimum wage pursuant to s. 24, Art. X of the State
Constitution and this section and that the employee is knowingly
and voluntarily choosing to receive a lesser amount for his or
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb221-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 221 2026
her work-based learning opportunity as described in paragraph
(b). An employer may not coerce an employee to opt out of
receiving the state minimum wage. If the employee is younger
than 18 years of age, in order for the waiver to be effective,
the employee's parent or guardian must have agreed and signed
the waiver on behalf of, and in addition to, the minor employee.
(d) Except as provided in paragraphs (b) and (c), an
employer must pay an employee a wage at or above the federal
minimum wage.
(e) At the expiration of the work-based learning
opportunity, the employee must be paid at or above the state
minimum wage regardless of his or her position or job title with
the employer.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb221-01-c1